hfst/noun-som-lex.txt
LEXICON UNKNOWN_M
hadhuudh	NOUNM "sorghum"           ;
harraad		NOUNM "thirst"            ;
kulayl		NOUNM "heat; hot"         ;
lamaddegaan	NOUNM "desert"            ;
markab		NOUNM "ship" 			  ;  			! maraakiib (f.); loan
qaali		NOUNM "expensive thing"   ;
qasab		NOUNM "sugar cane"        ;
rag			NOUNM "men"               ;
maxbuus		NOUNM "prisoner" 		  ;  			! maxaabiis (f.)
agagaar	    NOUNM "surroundings, neighborhood"                         ; 
askari	    NOUNM "soldier"                                            ; 
daalin	    NOUNM "oppressor"           ;                                   ! daalimiin (f), pl?           
dhagax	    NOUNM "stone"	            ;                                   	! pl. dhagxan - f, dhagaxyo  
Eebbe	    NOUNM "God"                                                ; 
farasmagaalo	NOUNM	"city center, town center"                     ; 
galbeed		NOUNM "west"											 ; 
! possibly d2m ... , ciidanka, ciidamo, ciidamada
ciidan:ciida{m}	NOUNM "force, workforce" ; 
! ciidamad, ciidamada, ciidamadaas, ciidamadaasi, ciidamadaii, ciidamadan, ciidamadeeda, ciidamadeeduna, ciidamadeena, ciidamadii, ciidamadiisa, ciidamadooda, ciidamadoodu, ciidamadu, ciidamda, ciidammada, ciidamo, ciidamobeeleedyo, ciidan, ciidanka, ciidankaas, ciidankaasi, ciidankan, ciidankani, ciidankeeda, ciidankii, ciidankiisu, ciidankooda, ciidanku
saxan		NOUNM 	"plate" ; ! TODO: suxuun (f) pl?
tababbar	NOUNM 	"training" ; 
telefishan	NOUNM 	"television" ; 
waqooyi		NOUNM 	"north" ; 
waqti		NOUNM 	"time" ; 
wakhti		NOUNM 	"time" ; 
wareysi		NOUNM 	"interview" ; 
wax			NOUNM 	"thing" ; ! TODO: waxyaabo (m.) pl.
waxtar		NOUNM 	"usefulness" ; 


LEXICON UNKNOWN_M_COL
geel		NOUNM "camels" 			  ;  ! geela, irregular definite.
habardugaag	NOUNM "wild animals"      ;
ido			NOUNM "sheep"             ;
midho		NOUNM "fruit"             ;
nuxur		NOUNM "nourishment"       ;
dad		   NOUNM  "people"            ; 
dumar	   NOUNM  "women"             ; 
adhi		NOUNM	"caprines"        ; 
waalid		NOUNM	"parents" 		;
xawaash		NOUNM	"spices"        ;


LEXICON UNKNOWN_M_MASS
maraq	NOUNM	"soup" ;  ! maraqu maraqa maraqii
caano	NOUNM	"milk" ; 
sarreen		NOUNM	"wheat"		;

LEXICON Word 
# ; 

! TODO: misc words
LEXICON MISC_WORDS
aad		Word		"very" ;


LEXICON Proper
BBC			PROP	"BBC" ;
Puntland	PROP	"puntland" ;
Iswiidhan	PROP	"Sweden" ;
Ciraaq		PROP	"Iraq" ; 

LEXICON PROP
+N+Prop:	# ;
